Utah statutes.
59-13-303.   Special fuel user permits -- Application -- Revocation of
permits under certain circumstances.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), each user shall, prior to
the use of the fuel in a qualified motor vehicle, apply to the commission on
forms prescribed by the commission for a special fuel user permit.  When the
application is approved by the commission, a single special fuel user permit
shall be issued to the user.
(b)  In place of the special fuel user permit issued under Subsection (1)(a),
a user may purchase a special fuel user trip permit.  A special fuel user trip
permit is valid for 96 hours or until the qualified vehicle leaves the state,
whichever occurs first.
(c)  The fee for the special fuel user trip permit is $25.
(2)  A special fuel user permit number shall be assigned to each licensed user
and is nontransferable and valid until surrendered by the user for nonuse or
until revoked by the commission.
(3)  The special fuel user permit expires December 31 of each year. Special
fuel user permits for the calendar year shall be honored until February 28 of
the following year.  An application shall be filed with the commission each
year for a new special fuel user permit for vehicles operated by a licensed
user.
(4) (a)  The special fuel user permit shall be kept in the passenger
compartment of each vehicle, or as otherwise authorized by the commission.
(b)  A user that does not comply with the requirements of this section may be
required to purchase a special fuel user trip permit.
(5)  The commission may revoke the special fuel user permit issued under this
section from any person refusing or neglecting to comply with this part.
(6)  Any user reporting Utah special fuel tax liability under Part 5,
Interstate Agreements, is exempted from the permit requirements of this
section.
